Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.315.045

Reorganization.

(1) A new school district may be formed comprising contiguous territory lying in either a single county or in two or more counties. The new district may comprise:

(a) Two or more whole school districts;

(b) Parts of two or more school districts; and/or

(c) Territory that is not a part of any school district if such territory is contiguous to the district to which it is transferred.

(2) The boundaries of existing school districts may be altered:

(a) By the transfer of territory from one district to another district;

(b) By the consolidation of one or more school districts with one or more school districts; or

(c) By the dissolution and annexation to a district of a part or all of one or more other districts or of territory that is not a part of any school district: PROVIDED, That such territory shall be contiguous to the district to which it is transferred or annexed.

(3) Territory may be transferred or annexed to or consolidated with an existing school district without regard to county boundaries.

[ 1999 c 315 s 201.]